Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4613
Close and substantial relationship, defined.

In sections 43-4613 to 43-4623, close and substantial relationship means a relationship in which a significant bond exists between a child and a nonparent.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 13.